Mississippi, session 2026, HB593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-49, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-49.  (1) A person who is qualified to register to vote in the State of Mississippi may register to vote by online application in the manner prescribed in this section. (2)  A qualified elector may register to vote under this section if the person: (a)  Is eligible to register to vote under Section 23-15-11; (b)  Has a current and valid Mississippi driver's license or photo identification card issued by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety; and (c)  Completes the online application to vote at least thirty (30) days before an election; however, if the thirtieth day to register before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the online registration application must remain open on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday and be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election.  The online submission date of an online application is the applicant's date of registration. ( * * *13)  (a)  The Secretary of State shall, with the support of the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, establish a secure Internet website to permit registration as a first-time voter in Mississippi and to permit registered electors to change their name, address or other information set forth in the elector's existing voter registration record. (b)  Upon the request of an elector through the secure website, the software used by the Secretary of State for processing applications through the website shall provide for verification that: (i)  The elector has a current and valid Mississippi driver's license or photo identification card issued by the Mississippi Department of Public Safety and the number for that driver's license or photo identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for the elector's driver's license or photo identification card that is on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety; (ii)  The name and date of birth provided by the voter matches the name and date of birth that is on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety;  * * *and (iii) The information provided by the elector matches the information on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety * * *.; and (iv) The elector is eligible to register to vote under Section 23-15-11. (4)  If any of the information does not match that on file with the Mississippi Department of Public Safety, the changes shall be rejected. (5)  (a)  The form of the online application to vote must be established by rule duly adopted by the Secretary of State.  Once  a qualified elector has completed the online application to vote, the application must be reviewed by the county registrar of the applicant's county of residence. (b)  The county registrar of the applicant's county of residence shall verify the application either by matching the applicant's Mississippi driver's license number through the Mississippi Department of Public Safety or by matching the applicant's social security number through the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators.  Within fourteen (14) days of submission of an online voter registration application, the county registrar shall complete action on the application, including any attempts to notify the applicant of the status of his or her application. (c)  If the county registrar determines that the applicant is qualified and his or her application is complete, the county registrar shall mail the applicant written notification that the application has been approved, specifying the county voting precinct, municipal voting precinct, if any, polling place and supervisor district in which the person may vote.  This written notification of approval containing the specified information will be the voter's registration card.  The registration card must be provided by the county registrar to the applicant in accordance with Section 23-15-39.  Upon entry of the voter registration information into the Statewide Elections Management System, the system will assign a voter registration number to the applicant.  The assigned voter registration number must be shown clearly on the written notification of approval.  In mailing the written notification, the county registrar shall note the following on the envelope:  "DO NOT FORWARD".  If a registration notification form is returned as undeliverable, the voter's registration is void. (d)  An online voter application must be rejected for any of the following reasons: (i) An incomplete portion of the application makes it impossible for the registrar to determine the eligibility of the applicant to register; (ii) The county registrar is unable to determine, from the address and information stated on the application, the precinct in which the voter should be assigned or the supervisor district in which he or she is entitled to vote; (iii) The applicant is not qualified to register to vote pursuant to Section 23-15-11; (iv) The county registrar determines that the applicant already is registered as a qualified elector of the county; or (v) The county registrar is unable to verify the application by matching the applicant's Mississippi driver's license number through the Mississippi Department of Public Safety or by matching the applicant's social security number through the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. (e)  If the online voter application of a person is subject to rejection for any of the reasons set forth in paragraph (d)(i) or (ii) of this subsection, and it appears to the county registrar that the defect or omission is of such a minor nature that any necessary additional information may be supplied by the applicant over the telephone or by further correspondence, the county registrar may write or call the applicant at the telephone number or address, or both, provided on the application.  If the county registrar is able to contact the applicant by mail or telephone, the county registrar shall attempt to ascertain the necessary information, and if this information is sufficient for the registrar to complete the application, the applicant must be registered.  If the necessary information cannot be obtained by mail or telephone, or is not sufficient to complete the application within fourteen (14) days of receipt, the county registrar shall give the applicant written notice of the rejection and provide the reason for the rejection.  The county registrar shall further inform the applicant that he or she has a right to attempt to register by appearing in person or by filing another online application. (f)  If an online application is subject to rejection for the reason stated in paragraph (d)(iv) of this subsection and the "present home address" portion of the application is different from the residence address for the applicant found in the Statewide Elections Management System, the online application must be deemed an online request to update the voter's registration pursuant to Section 23-15-13.  The county registrar or the election commissioners shall update the voter's residence address in the Statewide Elections Management System and, if necessary, advise the voter of a change in the location of his or her county or municipal polling place by mailing the voter a new voter registration card. ( * * *26)  Any person who attempts to change registration information or register to vote under this section shall be subject to the penalties for false registration provided for in Section 97-13-25. ( * * *37)  The Secretary of State and the Department of Public Safety shall enter into a memorandum of understanding providing for the sharing of information required to facilitate the requirements of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 23-15-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-13.  (1)  An elector who moves from one (1) ward or voting precinct to another ward within the same municipality or voting precinct within the same county shall not be disqualified to vote, but he or she shall be entitled to have his or her registration transferred to his or her new ward or voting precinct upon making a written or online request therefor at any time up to thirty (30) days before the election at which he or she offers to vote, and if the removal occurs within thirty (30) days of such election he or she shall be entitled to vote in his or her new ward or voting precinct by affidavit ballot as provided in Section 23-15-573.  If the thirtieth day to transfer the elector's registration before an election falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, the transfer of the elector's registration submitted on the business day immediately following the Sunday or legal holiday shall be accepted and entered into the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling voters to vote in the next election. (2)  If an elector requests a change in his or her address under Section 23-15-49 and the address is located in a precinct in the county or municipality that differs from the precinct as reflected in the then current registration records, the request shall be treated in the same manner as a written request to transfer the elector's registration under subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 3.  Section 23-15-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-35.  (1)  The clerk of the municipality shall be the registrar of voters of the municipality, and shall take the oath of office prescribed by Section 268 of the Constitution.  The municipal registration shall conform to the county registration which shall be a part of the official record of registered voters as contained in the Statewide Elections Management System.  The municipal clerk shall comply with all the provisions of law regarding the registration of voters, including the use of the voter registration applications used by county registrars and prescribed by the Secretary of State under Sections 23-15-39 and 23-15-47 and the use of online voter registration applications provided in Section 23-15-49. (2)  The municipal clerk shall be authorized to register applicants as county electors.  The municipal clerk shall forward notice of registration, a copy of the application for registration, and any changes to the registration when they occur, either by certified mail to the county registrar or by personal delivery to the county registrar provided that a numbered receipt is signed by the county registrar in return for the described documents.  Upon receipt of the copy of the application for registration or changes to the registration, and if a review of the application indicates that the applicant meets all the criteria necessary to qualify as a county elector, then the county registrar shall make a determination of the county voting precinct in which the person making the application shall be required to vote.  The county registrar shall send this county voting precinct information by United States first-class mail, postage prepaid, to the person at the address provided on the application.  Any mailing costs incurred by the municipal clerk or the county registrar in effectuating this subsection (2) shall be paid by the county board of supervisors.  If a review of the copy of the application for registration or changes to the registration indicates that the applicant is not qualified to vote in the county, the county registrar shall challenge the application.  The county election commissioners shall review any challenge or disqualification, after having notified the applicant by certified mail of the challenge or disqualification. (3)  The municipal clerk shall issue to the person making the application a copy of the application and the county registrar shall process the application in accordance with the law regarding the handling of voter registration applications. (4)  The receipt of a copy of the application for registration sent pursuant to Section 23-15-39(3) shall be sufficient to allow the applicant to be registered as an elector in the municipality, provided that such application is not challenged as provided for therein. (5)  The municipal clerk of each municipality shall provide the county registrar in which the municipality is located the information necessary to conform the municipal registration to the county registration which shall be a part of the official record of registered voters as contained in the Statewide Elections Management System.  If any changes to the information occur as a result of redistricting, annexation or other reason, it shall be the responsibility of the municipal clerk to timely provide the changes to the county registrar.  The location of a polling place shall not be altered within sixty (60) days of any primary, general, runoff or special election unless exigent circumstances exist.  If the governing authorities find that exigent circumstances exist where a polling place needs to be altered within sixty (60) days of an election, then their reasons for making that decision shall be spread upon the minutes at their next scheduled meeting.  When the location of a polling place is altered within sixty (60) days of an election, public notice of the change shall be posted at city hall, the courthouse, the registrar's office, the previous polling place location if it is a public building, and for three (3) consecutive weeks, or each week before the election if the alteration happens within three (3) weeks of the election, in a newspaper that is circulated in the area. SECTION 4.  Section 23-15-37, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-37.  (1)  The registrar shall register the electors of his or her county at any time during regular office hours. (2)  The county registrar may keep his or her office open to register voters from 8:00 a.m. until 7:00 p.m., including the noon hour, for the five (5) business days immediately preceding the thirtieth day before any regularly scheduled primary or general election.  The county registrar shall also keep his or her office open from 8:00 a.m. until 12:00 noon on the Saturday immediately preceding the thirtieth day before any regularly scheduled primary or general election, unless that Saturday falls on a legal holiday, in which case registration applications submitted on the Monday immediately following the legal holiday shall be accepted and entered in the Statewide Elections Management System for the purpose of enabling such voters to vote in the next primary or general election. (3)  The registrar, or any deputy registrar duly appointed by law, may visit and spend such time as he or she may deem necessary at any location in his or her county, selected by the registrar not less than thirty (30) days before an election, for the purpose of registering voters. (4)  A person who is physically disabled and unable to visit the office of the registrar to register to vote due to such disability may contact the registrar and request that the registrar or the registrar's deputy visit him or her for the purpose of registering such person to vote.  The registrar or the registrar's deputy shall visit that person as soon as possible after such request and provide the person with an application for registration, if necessary.  The completed application for registration shall be executed in the presence of the registrar or the registrar's deputy. (5)  (a)  In the fall and spring of each year the registrar of each county shall furnish all public schools with instructions for submitting an online voter registration application and mail-in voter registration applications. The instructions and mail-in voter registration applications shall be provided in a reasonable time to enable those students who will be eighteen (18) years of age before a general election to be able to vote in the primary and general elections. (b)  Each public school district shall permit access to all public schools of this state for the county registrar or the county registrar's deputy to register persons who are eligible to vote and to provide voter education. SECTION 5.  Section 23-15-79, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-79.  (1)  Unless the application for registration was made pursuant to Section 23-15-47 or Section 23-15-49, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the application for registration to vote was initially received by the registrar or, if submitted by mail, the postmark date, regardless of the date on which the county election commission, circuit court or Supreme Court, as the case may be, makes its final determination allowing the registration. (2)  In the case of an application for registration that has been made pursuant to Section 23-15-47, the date of registration to vote shall be the date the complete and legible application form is received by the county registrar, or, if mailed, the postmark date of the complete and legible application. (3)  In the case of an application for registration that has been made pursuant to Section 23-15-49, the date of registration to vote shall be the online submission date of the online application. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.